Tennessee, session 114, SB2326.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 66, Chapter 27, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
66-27-901.
As used in this part:
(1) "Board of directors" means the body, regardless of name, designated
in the declaration to act on behalf of a homeowners' association;
(2) "Declaration" means an instrument, however denominated, that
creates a homeowners' association, and amendments to that instrument,
including restrictive covenants, bylaws, and similar instruments governing the
administration or operation of a homeowners' association; and
(3) "Homeowners' association" or "HOA":
(A) Means an incorporated or unincorporated association owned
by, or whose members consist primarily of, the owners of the residential
property covered by the declaration and through which the owners, or the
board of directors or similar governing body, manage or regulate the
residential subdivision; and
(B) Includes a unit owners' association organized under § 66-27-
401.
66-27-902.
SB2326
012636
- 1 -

A homeowners' association collecting assessments for common expenses shall
obtain and maintain a blanket fidelity bond to insure the HOA against losses resulting
from theft or dishonesty committed by the officers, directors, or persons employed by the
HOA, or committed by any managing agent or employee of the managing agent. Such
bond or insurance policy must provide coverage in an amount equal to the reserve
balances of the association plus one-fourth (1/4) of the aggregate annual assessment
income of such HOA; provided, that the minimum coverage amount must be ten
thousand dollars ($10,000). The board of directors or managing agent may obtain such
bond or insurance on behalf of the HOA.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012636